Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.020

Additional bond—Penalty for failure to furnish.

If the governor deems any bond filed by the attorney general insufficient, he or she may require an additional bond for any amount not exceeding five thousand dollars.

If any attorney general fails to give such additional bond as required by the governor within twenty days after notice in writing of such requirement, his or her office may be declared vacant by the governor and filled as provided by law.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5047; 1965 c 8 s 43.10.020. Prior: (i) 1929 c 92 s 1, part; RRS s 11030, part. (ii) 1929 c 92 s 2; RRS s 11031; prior: 1921 c 119 s 1; 1888 p 7 ss 4, 5.]